Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 9. Prohibited Acts, Penalties, and Damages.
Sec. 46.03.761.
Administrative penalties.

The department may assess an administrative penalty against an entity that violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of AS

46.03.720(b)

or a term or condition of a regulation, order, permit, approval, or certificate of the department issued or adopted under AS

46.03.720(b)

.

Before assessing an administrative penalty under this section, the department shall

communicate about the alleged noncompliance with the entity and the governing body of the community or municipality whose residents are served by the public water system; communication under this paragraph must be in language designed to be easily understood by the entity and governing body and must clearly describe the nature of the alleged noncompliance;

offer technical assistance to aid in correcting the alleged noncompliance when the department has reason to believe that the entity may lack the resources or expertise to get technical assistance from other sources; and

unless the alleged noncompliance poses an immediate threat to the public health, give the entity a reasonable amount of time to correct the alleged noncompliance after the department has complied with (1) and (2) of this subsection.

If, after complying with (b) of this section, the department determines that noncompliance still exists and the violation is subject to a penalty under this section, the department may make a preliminary determination to assess the penalty. The department shall provide notice to the entity of its preliminary determination. The entity may, within 10 days after receiving the notice, request the department to reconsider its decision. If a timely request for reconsideration is made, the department shall reconsider its preliminary determination and may affirm or modify the determination. The department shall notify the entity of the decision. If a timely request for reconsideration is not received or if, after reconsideration, the department determines that a penalty should be assessed, the department may assess the penalty. The department shall provide notice of the assessment and instructions for contesting and appealing the assessment to the entity by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice must inform the entity of the amount of the proposed penalty and that the entity has 45 days within which to file a notice with the department contesting the proposed penalty. If, within 45 days after receiving the notification issued by the department, the entity fails to file a notice contesting the proposed penalty, the proposed penalty is considered a final order. The department may extend the time periods specified in this subsection for good cause.

If an entity sends notice to the department contesting a proposed penalty under (c) of this section, the department shall afford an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with its adjudicatory hearing procedures. After an opportunity for a hearing, the department shall issue an order, based upon findings of fact, affirming, modifying, or rescinding the administrative penalty. The order must include notice that the entity may appeal the order to the superior court and the address of the appropriate superior court. The order is the final agency action on the penalty.

An entity against whom an administrative penalty is assessed under this section may obtain judicial review of the administrative penalty by filing a notice of appeal in the superior court as provided by the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure. An order of the department under (d) of this section becomes final and is not subject to review by a court if a notice of appeal is not filed with the superior court within the period provided for by the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Unless the notice of appeal is incomplete or otherwise not in conformance with court rules, a notice of appeal under (e) of this section is considered to be filed with the superior court on the day the entity delivers the appropriate documents and fee to the appropriate superior court. Determining whether the notice of appeal is complete and otherwise in conformance with court rules is the responsibility of the superior court.

An administrative penalty assessed under this section may not exceed (1) $1,000 a day for each violation if the affected public water supply system serves a population of more than 10,000 persons; (2) $250 a day for each violation if the affected public water supply system serves a population of 10,000 or fewer persons but more than 1,000 persons; and (3) $100 a day for each violation if the public water supply system serves 1,000 or fewer persons. Each provision, term, or condition violated is a separate and distinct violation. If a violation of a provision, term, or condition continues from day to day, each day is a separate violation.

In determining the amount of a penalty assessed under this section, the department shall consider

the effect of the violation on the public health or the environment;

reasonable costs incurred by the state in the detection, investigation, and attempted correction of the violation;

the economic savings realized by the entity by not complying with the requirement for which a violation is charged;

any previous history of compliance or noncompliance by the entity with this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, and AS 46.14;

the need to deter future violations;

the extent and seriousness of the violation, including the potential for the violation to threaten public health or the environment;

whether the entity achieved compliance with the requirement violated within the shortest feasible time; and

other factors considered relevant to the assessment that are adopted by the department in regulation.

If an entity fails to pay an administrative penalty assessed under this section after the penalty becomes final, the department may bring an action to collect the penalty. The amount of the penalty is not subject to review by the court in such an action.

In a collection action under (i) of this section, the court shall award the prevailing party full reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in the collection action.

Action under this section by the department does not limit or otherwise affect the authority of the department to otherwise enforce this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.08, AS 46.09, AS 46.14, or regulations adopted under those statutes, or to recover damages, restoration expenses, investigation costs, court costs, attorney fees, or other necessary expenses. The court shall set off against a judicial civil assessment subsequently awarded under AS

46.03.760

an amount ordered to be paid under this section by the same entity for the same violation.

In this section, “entity” means the owner or operator of a public water system.

History.

(§ 3 ch 94 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For administrative penalties, see 18 AAC 80, art. 12.

Sec. 46.03.763.
Attorney fees and costs.

In an action to impose civil penalties under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

, or

46.03.760

for a discharge of oil, the state may recover full reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred by the state in maintaining the action.

History.

(§ 4 ch 41 SLA 1989)

Sec. 46.03.765.
Injunctions.

The superior court has jurisdiction to enjoin a violation of this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, AS 46.14, or of a regulation, a lawful order of the department, or permit, approval, or acceptance, or term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14. In actions brought under this section, temporary or preliminary relief may be obtained upon a showing of an imminent threat of continued violation, and probable success on the merits, without the necessity of demonstrating physical irreparable harm. The balance of equities in actions under this section may affect the timing of compliance, but not the necessity of compliance within a reasonable period of time.

History.

(§ 10 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.03.770.
Detention of vessel without warrant as security for damages.

A vessel that is used in or in aid of a violation of AS

46.03.740

—

46.03.750

may be detained after a valid search by the department, an agent of the department, a peace officer of the state, or an authorized protection officer of the Department of Fish and Game. Upon judgment of the court having jurisdiction that the vessel was used in, or was the cause of, a violation of AS

46.03.740

—

46.03.750

with knowledge of its owner or under circumstances indicating that the owner should reasonably have had this knowledge, the vessel may be held as security for payment to the state of the amount of damages assessed by the court under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

,

46.03.760

,

46.03.822

, and AS

46.04.030(g)

. If the damages assessed are not paid within 30 days after judgment or final determination of an appeal, the vessel shall be sold at public auction, or as otherwise directed by the court, and the damages paid from the proceeds. The balance, if any, shall be paid by the court to the owner of the vessel. The court shall permit the release of the vessel upon posting of a bond set by the court in an amount not to exceed the maximum amount of damages available under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

,

46.03.760

,

46.03.822

, and AS

46.04.030(g)

. The damages received under this section shall be transmitted to the proper state officer for deposit in the general fund. A vessel seized under this section shall be returned or the bond exonerated if no damages are assessed under AS 46.03.758, 46.03.759, 46.03.760, 46.03.822, or AS 46.04.030(g).

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 41 SLA 1989)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Letters of undertaking should be accepted only in lieu of security under this section. Aug. 28, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

A properly drawn-up protection and indemnity club letter of undertaking is an adequate substitute for a formal bond to allow release of a vessel under this section. Aug. 28, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.03.780.
Liability for restoration.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14, or who fails to perform a duty imposed by this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14, or violates or disregards an order, permit, or other determination of the department made under the provisions of this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14, respectively, and thereby causes the death of fish, animals, or vegetation or otherwise injures or degrades the environment of the state is liable to the state for damages.

Liability for damages under (a) of this section includes an amount equal to the sum of money required to restock injured land or waters, to replenish a damaged or degraded resource, or to otherwise restore the environment of the state to its condition before the injury.

Damages under (a) of this section shall be recovered by the attorney general on behalf of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 7 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 111 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1982, three references in (a) of this section were changed from “AS 43.04” to “AS 46.04” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 46.03.790.
Criminal penalties.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person with criminal negligence

violates a provision of this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14, a regulation or order of the department, or a permit, approval, or acceptance, or a term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.09, or AS 46.14;

fails to provide information or provides false information required by AS

46.03.465

,

46.03.475

,

46.03.755

, AS 46.04, or AS 46.09, or by a regulation adopted by the department under AS

46.03.020

(12),

46.03.460

,

46.03.755

, AS 46.04, or AS 46.09;

makes a false statement or representation in an application, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.313

applicable to hazardous wastes or a regulation adopted by the department under AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.313

;

makes a false statement, representation, or certification in an application, notice, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.475

, AS 46.14, or a regulation adopted under AS

46.03.020

(12), 46.03.460, or AS 46.14; or

renders inaccurate a monitoring device or method required to be maintained under AS 46.14, a regulation adopted under AS 46.03.020(12) or AS 46.14, a permit issued by the department or a local air quality control program under AS 46.14, or a permit issued by the department under the program authorized by AS 46.03.020(12).

[Repealed, § 5 ch 141 SLA 1990.]

Each day on which a violation described in this section occurs is considered a separate violation.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person who with criminal negligence discharges oil in violation of AS

46.03.740

or who, when required by an oil discharge to comply with the provisions of an oil discharge contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

, with criminal negligence fails to comply with the plan is guilty of

a class C felony if the oil discharge is 10,000 barrels or more;

a class A misdemeanor if the oil discharge is less than 10,000 barrels.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 141 SLA 1990.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 141 SLA 1990.]

Notwithstanding AS

12.55.035(b)

, upon conviction of a violation of a regulation adopted under AS

46.03.020

(12) or of a violation related to AS 46.14 and described in (a) of this section, a defendant who is not an organization may be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 for each separate violation.

Notwithstanding (a) and (d) of this section, a person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person negligently

violates a regulation adopted by the department under AS

46.03.020

(12);

violates a permit issued under the program authorized by AS

46.03.020

(12);

fails to provide information or provides false information required by a regulation adopted under AS 46.03.020(12);

makes a false statement, representation, or certification in an application, notice, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with a permit issued under or a regulation adopted under AS 46.03.020(12); or

renders inaccurate a monitoring device or method required to be maintained by a permit issued under or a regulation adopted under AS 46.03.020(12).

In this section,

“barrel” has the meaning given in AS

46.04.900

;

“criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 11 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 266 SLA 1976; am §§ 8, 9 ch 116 SLA 1980; am §§ 11, 12 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 112 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 77 SLA 1984; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 141 SLA 1990; am § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 19, 20 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am §§ 9, 10 ch 143 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 17 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i); relettered in 2008, at which time subsection (h) was relettered as (g) and subsection (g) was relettered as (i).

Cross references. —

For fines for misdemeanors and felonies, see AS

12.55.035

; for imprisonment for felonies, see AS

12.55.125

, and for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Proposed regulation establishing compliance with management practice under AS 41.17 and regulations as an affirmative defense to prosecution for alleged water quality violations for the forestry industry alone would cause an equal protection problem; executive agency cannot, by regulation, create an affirmative defense to what the legislature has determined should be prosecuted. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Sec. 46.03.800.
Water nuisances.

A person is guilty of creating or maintaining a nuisance if the person puts a dead animal carcass, or part of one, excrement, or a putrid, nauseous, noisome, decaying, deleterious, or offensive substance into, or in any other manner befouls, pollutes, or impairs the quality of, a spring, brook, creek, branch, well, or pond of water that is or may be used for domestic purposes.

A person who neglects or refuses to abate the nuisance upon order of the department is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable as provided in AS

46.03.790

. In addition to this punishment, the court shall assess damages against the defendant for the expenses of abating the nuisance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

Balance of convenience or social utility: modern status of rules as to balance of convenience or social utility as affecting relief from nuisance. 40 ALR3d 601.

Pollution control agency: right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 ALR3d 665.

Sec. 46.03.810.
Air and land nuisances.

A person is guilty of creating or maintaining a nuisance if the person

places or deposits upon a lot, street, beach, or premises, or upon or anywhere within 200 feet of a public highway, any garbage, offal, dead animals, or any other matter or thing that would be obnoxious or cause the spread of disease or in any way endanger the health of the community;

allows to be placed or deposited upon any premises owned by the person or under the person’s control garbage, offal, dead animals, or any other matter or thing that would be obnoxious or offensive to the public or that would produce, aggravate, or cause the spread of disease or in any way endanger the health of the community.

A person who neglects or refuses to abate the nuisance upon order of an officer of the Department of Environmental Conservation is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable as provided in AS

46.03.790

. In addition to this punishment, the court shall assess damages against the defendant for the expenses of abating the nuisance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 12 ch 220 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

Modern status of rules as to balance of convenience or social utility as affecting relief from nuisance. 40 ALR3d 601.

Operation of incinerator as nuisance. 41 ALR3d 1009.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 ALR3d 665.

Sec. 46.03.820.
Emergency powers.

When the department finds, after investigation, that a person is causing, engaging in, or maintaining a condition or activity that, in the judgment of its commissioner presents an imminent or present danger to the health or welfare of the people of the state or would result in or be likely to result in irreversible or irreparable damage to the natural resources or environment, and it appears to be prejudicial to the interests of the people of the state to delay action until an opportunity for a hearing can be provided, the department may, without prior hearing, order that person by notice to discontinue, abate, or alleviate the condition or activity. The proscribed condition or activity shall be immediately discontinued, abated, or alleviated.

Upon receipt of an order of the department made under (a) of this section, the person affected has the right to be heard and to present proof to the department that the condition or activity does not constitute an actual or potential source of irreversible or irreparable damage to the natural resources or environment of the state, or that the order may constitute a substantial private hardship.

In the commissioner’s discretion or upon application made by the recipient of an order within 15 days of receipt of the order, the department shall schedule a hearing at the earliest possible time. The hearing shall be scheduled within five days of the receipt of the application. The submission of an application or the scheduling of a hearing does not stay the operation of the department’s order issued under (a) of this section.

After a hearing the department may affirm, modify, or set aside the order. An order affirmed, modified, or set aside after hearing is subject to judicial review as provided in AS

44.62.560

. The order is not stayed pending judicial review unless the commissioner so directs. If an order is not immediately complied with, the attorney general, upon request of the commissioner, shall seek enforcement of the order.

The department may adopt additional regulations prescribing the procedure to be followed in the issuance of emergency orders.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 46.03.822.
Liability for the release of hazardous substances.

Notwithstanding any other provision or rule of law and subject only to the defenses set out in (b) of this section, the exceptions set out in (i) and (m) of this section, the exception set out in AS

09.65.240

, and the limitation on liability provided under AS

46.03.825

, the following persons are strictly liable, jointly and severally, for damages, for the costs of response, containment, removal, or remedial action incurred by the state, a municipality, or a village, and for the additional costs of a function or service, including administrative expenses for the incremental costs of providing the function or service, that are incurred by the state, a municipality, or a village, and the costs of projects or activities that are delayed or lost because of the efforts of the state, the municipality, or the village, resulting from an unpermitted release of a hazardous substance or, with respect to response costs, the substantial threat of an unpermitted release of a hazardous substance:

the owner of, and the person having control over, the hazardous substance at the time of the release or threatened release; this paragraph does not apply to a consumer product in consumer use;

the owner and the operator of a vessel or facility, from which there is a release, or a threatened release that causes the incurrence of response costs, of a hazardous substance;

any person who, at the time of disposal of any hazardous substance, owned or operated any facility or vessel at which the hazardous substances were disposed of, from which there is a release, or a threatened release that causes the incurrence of response costs, of a hazardous substance;

any person who by contract, agreement, or otherwise arranged for disposal or treatment, or arranged with a transporter for transport for disposal or treatment, of hazardous substances owned or possessed by the person, other than domestic sewage, or by any other party or entity, at any facility or vessel owned or operated by another party or entity and containing hazardous substances, from which there is a release, or a threatened release that causes the incurrence of response costs, of a hazardous substance;

any person who accepts or accepted any hazardous substances, other than refined oil, for transport to disposal or treatment facilities, vessels or sites selected by the person, from which there is a release, or a threatened release that causes the incurrence of response costs, of a hazardous substance.

In an action to recover damages or costs, a person otherwise liable under this section is relieved from liability under this section if the person proves

that the release or threatened release of the hazardous substance to which the damages relate occurred solely as a result of

an act of war;

except as provided under AS

46.03.823(c)

and

46.03.825(d)

, an intentional or negligent act or omission of a third party, other than a party or its agents in privity of contract with, or employed by, the person, and that the person

exercised due care with respect to the hazardous substance; and

took reasonable precautions against the act or omission of the third party and against the consequences of the act or omission; or

an act of God; and

in relation to (1)(B) or (C) of this subsection, that the person, within a reasonable period of time after the act occurred,

discovered the release or threatened release of the hazardous substance; and

began operations to contain and clean up the hazardous substance.

For purposes of (b)(1)(B) of this section, a third party or an agent of a third party is in privity of contract with the person who is otherwise liable, if the third party or its agent and the person are parties to a land contract, deed, or other instrument transferring title or possession of the real property on which the facility in question is located, unless that property was acquired by the person after the disposal or placement of the hazardous substance on, in, or at the facility, and the person establishes that the person has satisfied the requirements of (b)(1)(B) of this section and establishes that

at the time the person acquired the facility the person did not know and had no reason to know that a hazardous substance that is the subject of the release or threatened release was disposed of on, in, or at the facility;

the person is a governmental entity that acquired the facility by escheat, or through another involuntary transfer or acquisition, or through the exercise of eminent domain authority by purchase or condemnation;

[Repealed, § 4 ch 112 SLA 2018.]

the person acquired the facility by inheritance or bequest; or

the person is a state governmental entity and the state acquired the facility under Public Law 85-508 (Alaska Statehood Act).

To establish that a person had no reason to know that the hazardous substance was disposed of on, in, or at the facility, as provided in (c)(1) and (l) of this section, the person must have undertaken, at the time of voluntary acquisition, all reasonable inquiries into the previous ownership and uses of the property consistent with good commercial or customary practice in an effort to minimize liability. For purposes of this subsection a court shall take into account all relevant facts, including

any specialized knowledge or experience the person has;

the relationship of the purchase price to the value of the property if it were uncontaminated;

commonly known or reasonably ascertainable information about the property;

the obviousness of the presence or likely presence of contamination at the property; and

the ability to detect contamination by appropriate inspection.

This section does not diminish the liability of a person who previously owned or operated a facility or vessel and who would otherwise be liable. If the person obtained actual knowledge of the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance at the facility or vessel and subsequently transferred ownership to another without disclosing that knowledge, the person is liable under (a)(2) of this section, and a defense under (b)(1)(B) of this section is not available to the person.

This section does not diminish the liability of a person who, by an act or omission, caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance that is the subject of the action relating to the facility or vessel.

An indemnification, hold harmless, or similar agreement, or conveyance of any nature is not effective to transfer liability under this section from the owner or operator of a facility or vessel or from a person who might be liable for a release or substantial threat of a release under this section. This subsection does not bar an agreement to insure, hold harmless, or indemnify a party to the agreement for liability under this section. This subsection does not bar a cause of action that an owner, operator, or other person subject to liability under this section, or a guarantor, has or would have, by reason of subrogation or otherwise against another person.

The state, a municipality, a village, a person who acts as a volunteer and is engaged in a response action under the direction of the federal or state on-scene coordinator, and a vessel of opportunity engaged in a response action under the direction of the federal or state on-scene coordinator are not liable under this section for costs or damages as a result of actions taken in response to an emergency created by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance generated by or from a facility or vessel owned by another person unless the actions taken by the state, the municipality, the village, the volunteer, or the vessel constitute gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

In an action to recover damages and costs, a person otherwise jointly and severally liable under this section is relieved of joint liability and is liable severally for damages and costs attributable to that person if the person proves that

the harm caused by the release or threatened release is divisible; and

there is a reasonable basis for apportionment of costs and damages to that person.

A person may seek contribution from any other person who is liable under (a) of this section during or after a civil action under (a) of this section or after the issuance of a potential liability determination by the department. Actions under this subsection shall be brought under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure and are governed by state law. In resolving claims for contribution under this section, the court may allocate damages and costs among liable parties using equitable factors determined to be appropriate by the court. This subsection does not diminish the right of a person to bring an action for contribution in the absence of a civil action under (a) of this section.

A unit of state or local government that acquired ownership or control of a vessel or facility through bankruptcy, foreclosure, deed in lieu of foreclosure, tax delinquency proceeding, abandonment, escheat, the exercise of eminent domain authority by purchase or condemnation, or circumstances in which the governmental unit involuntarily acquired title by virtue of its function as a sovereign is not liable as an owner or operator under this section unless the governmental unit has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance at or from the facility or vessel, in which case, the governmental unit is subject to liability under this section in the same manner and to the same extent, both procedurally and substantively, as any nongovernmental entity. A hazardous substance release shall be determined to have occurred as provided in this section. For purposes of this subsection, “caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance”

does not include the failure to prevent the passive leaching or migration at or from a facility or vessel of a hazardous substance in the air, land, or water that had first been released to the environment by a person other than the governmental unit that acquired the facility or vessel;

does not include the exercise or failure to exercise regulatory or enforcement authority;

after the ownership or control of the facility or vessel has been acquired by the governmental unit, includes

the spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emptying, injecting, escaping, or dumping of a hazardous substance from barrels, tanks, containers, or other closed receptacles; or

the abandonment or discarding of barrels, tanks, containers, or other closed receptacles containing a hazardous substance.

For purposes of determining liability in an action to recover damages or costs under this section, a person who acquires a facility and who, upon discovering a release or threatened release on, in, or at the facility that occurred before acquisition of the facility, who had no reason to know that a hazardous substance was disposed of on, in, or at the facility, and who, upon discovering the release or threatened release, acted in accordance with (b)(2) of this section to begin operations to contain and clean up the hazardous substance, may not be held liable under this section unless the person has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of the hazardous substance, in which case, the person is subject to liability under this section in the same manner as any other person. For purposes of this subsection, “caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of the hazardous substance”

does not include the failure to prevent the passive leaching or migration at or from a facility of a hazardous substance in the air, land, or water that had first been released into the environment by a person other than the person that acquired the facility;

after the ownership or control of the facility has been acquired by the person includes

the spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emptying, injecting, escaping, or dumping of a hazardous substance from barrels, tanks, containers, or other closed receptacles; or

the abandonment or discarding of barrels, tanks, containers, or other closed receptacles containing a hazardous substance.

A Native corporation that acquired land under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) is not liable under this section for a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance on the land unless the Native corporation, by an act or omission, caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of the hazardous substance.

In this section,

“damages” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.824

and includes damage to persons or to public or private property, damage to the natural resources of the state or a municipality, and damage caused by acts or omissions of a response action contractor for which the response action contractor is not liable under AS

46.03.823

or

46.03.825

;

“Native corporation” has the meaning given in 43 U.S.C. 1602(m);

“potential liability determination” means an administrative determination issued by the department notifying a person of the person’s potential liability under (a) of this section as the result of the release or threatened release of hazardous substances and includes a

letter notifying the person that the person is a potentially responsible party;

notice to a person of state interest in a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance;

request to the person for site characterization or cleanup;

notice of violation; and

similar notification by the department of a person’s potential liability under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 1989; am §§ 9, 10 ch 83 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 3 ch 92 SLA 1991; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 83 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 71 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 91 SLA 1999; am § 62 ch 56 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 15 SLA 2006; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 112 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in (b)(1)(B) of this section, “AS

46.03.825

(d)” was substituted for “46.03.825(e)”, to reflect the 1992 reorganization of AS

46.03.825

.

The subsections of this section have been relettered to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; in 1999, subsections (k) and (

l

) were enacted as (

l

) and (m) and an internal reference conformed; in 2018, (m)(2) was enacted as (n)(3); other subsections and paragraphs were also renumbered or relettered at those times.

Cross references. —

For provision that actions brought under this section may be brought directly against insurers or other persons providing evidence of financial responsibility, see AS

46.04.040(e)

; for detention of vessel as security of payment of damages, see AS

46.03.770

.

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective on January 15, 2019, in (a), substituted “the exceptions set out in (i) and (n)” for “the exception set out in (i)” preceding “of this section”; repealed (c)(3); added (m)(3) [now (n)(3)]; added (n) [now (m)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 91, SLA 1999 provides that subsection (k) “applies to a vessel or facility acquired by a governmental entity on or after July 2, 1999,” and that for purposes of § 3, ch. 91, SLA 1999, “when foreclosure by a municipality is involved, the property is acquired on the date it is deeded to the municipality under AS

29.45.450

.”

Section 3, ch. 15, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of (j) and (m) of this section apply “to liability for the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance that occurred (1) before April 27, 2006 and for which a final judgment regarding liability was not entered before April 27, 2006; or (2) on or after April 27, 2006.”

Amendments effective January 15, 2019, amending subsection (a), and repealing paragraph (c)(3) have been implemented.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Subsection (g) does not bar a hold harmless agreement between a rural community and the state. However, such a hold harmless agreement probably would not adequately protect the state from liability under subsection (a). Mar. 22, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Natural Resources may require an environmental property audit as a prerequisite to acceptance of an interagency land transfer. Mar. 22, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Where liquefied natural gas (LNG) company proposed to construct a pipeline roughly parallel to the oil line previously constructed, the LNG could use construction camp pads built by the oil company. Contamination occurring prior to any use by the LNG company was the responsibility of the oil company and the state of Alaska. However, if the LNG company used the camp pads without an environmental audit or other precautionary measure, it would become jointly, severally, and strictly liable for all contamination unless it could prove, by a preponderance of the evidence, that its contribution to the problem was divisible. Sept. 5, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The “innocent landowner” defense, both in federal law and in this section, applies to one who would otherwise be an owner potentially responsible party (PRP) who has not caused, could not have foreseen and prevented contamination, or was not aware of the contamination at the time of acquisition, and who does not have a contractual relationship with a party who did cause the contamination. To use the defense the PRP must act responsibly once it comes to know or should know of the contamination. Dec. 1, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.